Tennessee, session 114, SB2517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-3-307, is amended by deleting the
language "January 31" and substituting instead "January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2517
012293
- 1 -